Alaska statutes. Title 26. Military Affairs, Veterans, Disasters, and Aerospace.
Chapter 27. Alaska Aerospace Corporation.
Sec. 26.27.290.
Reserve fund.

The corporation shall establish and maintain a special fund called the Alaska Aerospace Corporation reserve fund in which there shall be deposited or transferred

all money appropriated by the legislature for the purpose of the fund in accordance with the provisions of (g) of this section;

all proceeds of bonds required to be deposited in the fund by terms of a contract between the corporation and its bondholders or a resolution of the corporation with respect to the proceeds of bonds;

all other money appropriated by the legislature to the reserve fund; and

any other money or funds of the corporation that it decides to deposit in the fund.

Subject to the provisions of (h) of this section, money in the reserve fund shall be held and applied solely to the payment of the interest on and principal of bonds of the corporation as the interest and principal become due and payable and for the retirement of bonds; and the money may not be withdrawn if a withdrawal would reduce the amount in the reserve fund to an amount less than the required debt service reserve except for payment of interest then due and payable on bonds and the principal of bonds then maturing and payable and for the retirement of bonds in accordance with the terms of a contract between the corporation and its bondholders and for which payments of other money of the corporation is not then available. In this subsection, “required debt service reserve” means, as of the date of computation, the amount required to be on deposit in the reserve fund as provided by resolution of the corporation.

Money in the reserve fund in excess of the required debt service reserve as defined in (b) of this section, whether by reason of investment or otherwise, may be withdrawn at any time by the corporation and transferred to another fund or account of the corporation subject to the provision of (h) of this section.

Money in the reserve fund may be invested in the same manner and on the same conditions as permitted for investment of funds belonging to the state or held in the treasury under AS

37.10.070

; however, the corporation may agree with the bondholders to further limit these investments.

For purposes of valuation, investments in the reserve fund shall be valued at par or if purchased at less than par, at cost unless otherwise provided by resolution of the corporation. Valuation on a particular date shall include the amount of interest then earned or accrued to that date on the money or investments in the reserve fund.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, bonds may not be issued by the corporation unless there is in the reserve fund the required debt service reserve for all bonds then issued and outstanding and for the bonds to be issued; however, the corporation may satisfy this requirement by depositing as much of the proceeds of the bonds to be issued, upon their issuance, as is needed to meet the required debt service reserve. The corporation may at any time issue its bonds or notes for the purpose of increasing the amount in the reserve fund to the required debt service reserve, or to meet whatever higher or additional reserve that may be fixed by the corporation with respect to the fund.

In order to assure the maintenance of the required debt service reserve in the reserve fund, the legislature may appropriate annually to the corporation for deposit in the fund the sum, certified by the chair of the corporation to the governor and to the legislature, that is necessary to restore the fund to an amount equal to the required debt service reserve. The chair annually, before January 30, shall make and deliver to the governor and to the legislature a certificate stating the sum required to restore the fund to that amount, and the certified sum may be appropriated and paid to the corporation during the then current state fiscal year. Nothing in this subsection creates a debt or liability of the state.

All amounts received on account of money appropriated to the reserve fund referred to in (a)(3) of this section shall be held and applied in accordance with (b) of this section; however, at the end of each fiscal year, if the amount in the reserve fund is in excess of the required debt service reserve, any amount representing earnings or income received on account of money appropriated to the reserve fund that exceeds the operating expenses of the corporation for that fiscal year shall be transferred to the general fund of the state.

All references to the reserve fund in this section include special accounts within the reserve fund that may be created by the corporation to secure the payment of particular bonds. The commissioner of revenue may lend surplus money in the general fund to the corporation for deposit to any account in the reserve fund in an amount equal to the required debt service reserve. The loans shall be made on the terms and conditions that may be agreed upon by the commissioner of revenue and the corporation, including, without limitation, terms and conditions providing that the loans need not be repaid until the obligations of the corporation secured and to be secured by the account in the reserve fund are no longer outstanding.

History.

(E.O. No. 115 § 2 (2011))

Sec. 26.27.300.
Cooperation with other authorities.

In issuing a bond, the corporation may request the assistance of and work with the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority and the Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Authority. The Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority may invest in and issue bonds for space-related projects of the Alaska Aerospace Corporation. The Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority and the Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Authority may purchase and market bonds of the Alaska Aerospace Corporation.

History.

(E.O. No. 115 § 2 (2011))

Sec. 26.27.310.
Investment of revenue.

The revenue and receipts of the corporation, to the extent they are not needed to pay bonds or other obligations of the corporation, shall be invested by the commissioner of revenue in cooperation with the corporation.

History.

(E.O. No. 115 § 2 (2011))

Sec. 26.27.320.
Legality of corporation bonds as investments.

Bonds of the corporation are legal and proper investments and security for public and private banking, insurance, and trust funds.

History.

(E.O. No. 115 § 2 (2011))

Sec. 26.27.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“board” means the board of directors of the Alaska Aerospace Corporation;

“corporation” means the Alaska Aerospace Corporation;

“landing site” means a site or facility designed, intended, or used for the landing or recovery of space vehicles, aircraft, or balloons;

“launch site” means a site or facility designed, intended, or used for the launching of space vehicles, sounding rockets, aircraft, or balloons;

“payload” means property or cargo, including people or animals, to be transported aboard a vehicle launched by the corporation;

“recovery” means the retrieval and recovery of space vehicles, payloads, and parts that have been launched from the corporation’s facilities;

“space vehicle” means a rocket, missile, booster, or other vehicle designed, intended, or used to reach high altitude.

History.

(E.O. No. 115 § 2 (2011))